Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1986.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 49-143.8 of Title 11, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section and
except for persons receiving benefits pursuant to Section 49-101 of
Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes, any member receiving benefits
from the Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and Retirement System as of
June 30, 2025, who continues to receive benefits on or after July 1,
2025, shall receive an increase in benefits of two percent (2%).

Req. No. 11160 Page 1

RBH No. 11160
B. Any increase in benefits a person is eligible to receive
pursuant to repealed Section 49-136 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma
Statutes after June 30, 2020, shall be used to offset the increase
in benefits provided in subsection A of this section.
C. Effective July 1, 2025, any person receiving benefits
pursuant to Section 49-101 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes
shall each receive an increase in benefits of two percent (2%) to:
1. Seven Dollars and sixty-eight cents ($7.68) per year of
credited service, not to exceed thirty (30) years of service if the
person's retirement benefit was not adjusted pursuant to the
provisions of Section 49-143.7 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Seven Dollars and eighty-three cents ($7.83) per year of
credited service, not to exceed thirty (30) years of service if the
person's retirement benefit was adjusted pursuant to Section 49-
143.7 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes from a base amount of
Seven Dollars and sixty-eight cents ($7.68); or
3. Seven Dollars and ninety-nine cents ($7.99) per year of
credited service, not to exceed thirty (30) years of service if the
person's retirement benefit was adjusted pursuant to Section 49-
143.7 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes from a base amount of
Seven Dollars and eighty-three cents ($7.83).
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 50-136.10 of Title 11, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Req. No. 11160 Page 2

RBH No. 11160
A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section, any
member receiving benefits from the Oklahoma Police Pension and
Retirement System as of June 30, 2025, who continues to receive
benefits on or after July 1, 2025, shall receive an increase in
benefits of two percent (2%).
B. Any increase in benefits a person is eligible to receive
pursuant to repealed Section 50-120 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, after June 30, 2020, shall be offset by the increase in
benefits, if any, provided by this section.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1104L of Title 20, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any member receiving benefits from the Uniform Retirement System
for Justices and Judges as of June 30, 2025, who continues to
receive benefits on or after July 1, 2025, shall receive an increase
in benefits of two percent (2%).
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-305.13 of Title 47, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section, any
member receiving benefits from the Oklahoma Law Enforcement
Retirement System as of June 30, 2025, who continues to receive
benefits on or after July 1, 2025, shall receive an increase in
benefits of two percent (2%).
Req. No. 11160 Page 3

RBH No. 11160
B. Any increase in benefits a person is eligible to receive
pursuant to subsection B, C, or D of Section 2-305 of Title 47 of
the Oklahoma Statutes after July 1, 2025, shall be offset by the
increase in benefits provided by this section.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 17-116.23 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any person receiving benefits from the Teachers' Retirement
System of Oklahoma as of June 30, 2025, other than those benefits
specified in subsection B of this section, who continues to receive
benefits on or after July 1, 2025, shall receive an increase in
benefits of two percent (2%).
B. Any person receiving benefits pursuant to subsection D of
Section 17-105 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes whose benefits
commenced prior to July 1, 2020, and who continues to receive
benefits on or after July 1, 2020, shall receive an increase in
benefits of two percent (2%).
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 930.12 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any member receiving benefits from the Oklahoma Public Employees
Retirement System as of June 30, 2025, who continues to receive
benefits on or after July 1, 2025, shall receive an increase in
benefits of two percent (2%).
Req. No. 11160 Page 4

RBH No. 11160
SECTION 7. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11160 CMA 01/08/25





















Req. No. 11160 Page 5

THOMAS E. CUMMINS CONSULTING ACTUARY, INC.
2512 E. 71st Street , Suite D ∙ Tulsa, Oklahoma 74136
(918) 492-9658 ∙ (918) 492- 9659
January 13, 2025
Representative Ranson
Room 602
Re: RBH No. 11160
RBH No. 11160 provides a 2% benefit increase for the retired members
of each of the State’s retirement systems.
RBH No. 11160 is a fiscal bill as defined by OPLAAA.
I am a member of the American Academy of Actuaries and meet the
Qualification Standards of the American Academy of Actuaries to
render the actuarial opinion herein.
Thomas E. Cummins
Thomas E. Cummins, MAAA